Utah statutes.
13-14a-1.   Definitions.

(1) (a)  "Dealer" means any person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of selling and retailing farm equipment, implements, utility and light industrial equipment, attachments, or repair parts, and includes retailers of yard and garden equipment not primarily engaged in the farm equipment business.

(b)  "Dealer" does not include:

(i)  a person who is engaged in the business of sales and service of heavy industrial or construction equipment; or

(ii)  a person, firm, or corporation who serves as the dealer for a membership group purchasing program.

(2)  "Independent wholesaler" means a person, firm, or corporation who stocks inventory for resale to retail dealers and who holds title to that inventory.

(3)  "Manufacturer" means any person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of manufacturing and distributing for retail sale farm implements, machinery, utility and light industrial equipment, attachments, or repair parts, and includes manufacturers of yard and garden equipment not primarily intended for farm use.

(4)  "Parts inventory" means repair parts held for resale and used to service farm implements, machinery, attachments, utility and light industrial equipment, and yard and garden equipment.

(5)  "Sales agreement" means a written, verbal, or implied on-going agreement between a dealer and a manufacturer or wholesaler under which the dealer agrees to sell at retail those items supplied by the manufacturer or wholesaler.  "Sales agreement" can include an assignment of an exclusive sales area by the manufacturer or wholesaler or the filing of UCC security documents by the manufacturer or wholesaler.

(6)  "Wholegoods" or "wholegoods inventory" means assembled or complete units of farm implements, machinery, utility and light industrial equipment, and yard and garden equipment and includes assembled or complete attachments.

(7)  "Wholesaler" as an entity's business or as the context requires may mean:

(a)  an independent wholesaler engaged in the business of distributing for retail sale the items listed in Subsection (4)  or (6),  that is obligated under Section 13-14a-2 to accept new and unsold wholegoods and parts from retailers on behalf of the manufacturer, but the obligation of the wholesaler may not exceed the obligation of the manufacturer; or

(b)  a dealer, as defined in Subsection (1), who in addition to retailing distributes equipment at the wholesale level.



Amended by Chapter 317, 1995 General Session

